Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 5 Community Care and Services for the Elderly

Cross references.

Long-term care ombudsman program, § 31-8-50 et seq.

Reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents in long-term care facilities, § 31-8-80 et seq.

Rights of residents of long-term care facilities generally, § 31-8-100 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 737, § 1/HB 1085, purported to amend this article, but did not amend Code Section 49-6-64.

49-6-60.
Legislative intent.

The purpose of this article is to assist functionally impaired elderly persons in living dignified and reasonably independent lives in their own homes or in the homes of relatives or caregivers through the development, expansion, reorganization, and coordination of various community based services. In recognition of the desire of older Georgians to reside at home or with their families as long as possible, the General Assembly intends that a continuum of care be established so that functionally impaired elderly persons age 60 and older may be assured the least restrictive environment suitable to their needs. The General Assembly further intends to maximize the utilization of existing community social and health services in order to prevent unnecessary placement of individuals in long-term care facilities. The development of innovative approaches to program management, staff training, and service delivery that impact on cost avoidance, cost effectiveness, and program efficiency shall be encouraged. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Community Health shall serve as the agency responsible for planning and implementing the provision of community based services to the elderly reimbursable under the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.”

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1901D, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-6-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-25/HB 228; Ga. L. 2016, p. 737, § 1/HB 1085.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “Department of Community Health” for “Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services)” in the middle of the last sentence of this Code section.

49-6-61.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Division” means the organizational unit within the Department of Community Health responsible for the administration of the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.”

“Functionally impaired elderly person” means any person 60 years of age or older with physical or mental limitations that restrict individual ability to perform the normal activities of daily living and which impede individual capacity to live independently.

The “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977” means Article 7 of Chapter 4 of this title.

“Lead agency” means one or more agencies designated by the Department of Community Health to assess services needed by functionally impaired elderly persons, to coordinate and provide community care services to those persons, provide case management, and, where necessary, subcontract with providers of service. A lead agency shall be either a private nonprofit entity or any public entity, including but not limited to any organizational unit of the department.

“Older Americans Act of 1965” means P.L. 92-258, as amended, on July 1, 1982.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1902D, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-6-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 49; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2016, p. 737, § 1/HB 1085; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 49/HB 323.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted former paragraph (1), which read: “ ‘Aging section’ means the single organizational unit within the Department of Human Services responsible for the planning and administration of services under the Older Americans Act of 1965.”; redesignated former paragraph (2) as present paragraph (1); substituted “Department of Community Health” for “Department of Human Services” in paragraph (1) and in the first sentence of paragraph (5); and added paragraph (2).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “the ‘Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.’ ” for “the Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.” at the end of paragraph (2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “this title” was substituted for “Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated” in paragraph (4).

U.S. Code.

The federal Older Americans Act of 1965, referred to in subsection (a), is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 3001

et seq.

49-6-62.
Establishment of community care unit; provision of services; annual service plan; annual progress report; fees and contributions; funding.

The department shall establish a community care unit within the Division of Medical Assistance. The community care unit shall plan and oversee implementation of a system of coordinated community care and support services for the elderly. The community care unit shall develop uniform assessment criteria that shall be used to determine an individual’s functional impairment and to evaluate on a periodic basis the individual’s need for community support services or institutionalized long-term care. The community care unit shall also define each community care service and establish standards for the delivery of community care services. Where appropriate, the community care unit shall utilize existing standards and definitions.

The department shall designate specified geographic service areas which shall be defined in such a way as to ensure the efficient delivery of community care services.

The department shall contract with a lead agency to coordinate and provide community care services within each specified geographic service area.

Each lead agency shall annually submit to the community care unit for approval a service plan evaluating the community care needs of the functionally impaired elderly, identifying priority services and target client groups, and detailing the means by which community care services will be delivered for the service area of that agency. The plan shall also include projected program costs and fees to be charged for services. The lead agency may exclude from the service plan those individuals eligible for benefits under the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” as amended, for whom there is a reasonable expectation that community based services would be more expensive than services the individual would otherwise receive which would have been reimbursable under the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” as amended.

The division shall prepare an annual community care service plan to be incorporated into the State Plan for Medical Assistance, as defined in the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.”

The department shall submit on January 1 of each year, beginning in 2017, a progress report on the implementation of the plan required by subsection (e) of this Code section to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the chairperson of the House Committee on Health and Human Services, and the chairperson of the Senate Health and Human Services Committee.

In accordance with rules promulgated by the department, lead agencies may collect fees for community care case management and other services. Such fees shall be established on a sliding scale based upon income and economic need. Fees will not be charged those individuals for the mandatory assessment described in subsection (e) of Code Section 49-6-63. Lead agencies may accept contributions of money or contributions in kind from functionally impaired elderly persons, members of their families, or other interested persons or organizations. Such contributions may not be a condition of services and shall only be used to further the provision of community care services.

Funding for services under this article shall be in addition to and not in lieu of funding for existing community services for the elderly. The department and the lead agency shall ensure that all other funding sources available, including reimbursement under the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977” and the Older Americans Act of 1965, have been used prior to utilizing state funds for community care for the elderly.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1903D, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-6-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 49; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 49; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 49; Ga. L. 2005, p. 48, § 8/HB 309; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-3/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 49/SB 340; Ga. L. 2016, p. 737, § 1/HB 1085.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language in subsection (g).

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsection (g).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “Division of Medical Assistance” for “aging section” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); deleted former subsection (e), which read: “The department shall develop a plan which shall provide for the implementation of a community care system in each of the specified geographic service areas by July 1, 1985. The three-year plan shall be developed concurrent with and integrated into the state plan on aging required under the Older Americans Act of 1965 and shall provide for coordination of all community based services for the elderly. The three-year plan shall include an inventory of existing services and an analysis comparing the cost of institutional long-term care and the cost of community care and other community based services for the elderly. The multiyear plan shall be presented to the Board of Human Services no later than July 31, 1983.”; redesignated former subsection (f) as present subsection (e); substituted the present provisions of subsection (e) for the former provisions, which read: “At the end of the three-year implementation period an annual community care service plan shall be incorporated into the state plan on aging.”; redesignated former subsection (g) as present subsection (f); in subsection (f), substituted “2017” for “1984” near the beginning, substituted “President of the Senate, the chairperson” for “Senate Committee on Assignments, the chairman” in the middle, and substituted “chairperson” for “chairman” near the end; and redesignated former subsections (h) and (i) as present subsections (g) and (h), respectively.

U.S. Code.

The federal Older Americans Act of 1965, referred to throughout this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 3001

et seq.

49-6-63.
Establishment by lead agency of community care service system; certification for benefits; evaluation by assessment team; volunteers; insurance coverage.

Each lead agency shall be responsible for the establishment of a community care service system which shall have as its primary purpose the prevention of unnecessary institutionalization of functionally impaired elderly persons through the provision of community based services. Each community care service system shall provide no fewer than six of the services listed in subsection (c) of this Code section, four of which shall include case management, assessment of functional impairment and needed community services, homemaker, and home health care services. Case management services shall be provided to each community care service recipient to ensure that arrangements are made for appropriate services. If independent living is no longer possible for a functionally impaired elderly person, the case manager shall assist the person in locating the most appropriate, least restrictive, and most cost beneficial alternative living arrangement.

All existing community resources available to the functionally impaired elderly person shall be coordinated into the community care service system to provide a continuum of care to such persons. The lead agency shall establish agreements, policies, and procedures for service integration and referral mechanisms with such programs.

Services to be coordinated by the lead agency shall include, without being limited to, the following:

Case management;

Assessment of functional impairment and needed community services;

Homemaker services;

Home health care services;

In-home personal care services;

Adult day health services;

Adult day care;

Habilitation services;

Respite care;

Older Americans Act services, including transportation, nutritional, social, and other services;

Title XX services;

Senior center services;

Protective services;

Financial assistance services, including, but not limited to, food stamps, Medicaid, medicare, and Supplemental Security Income;

Health maintenance services; and

Other community services.

Priority in provision of community care services shall be given to those individuals who have been certified for skilled or intermediate institutional nursing care service benefits conferred by the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977” and who need home and community based services in order to avoid institutionalization. Services may be provided to other functionally impaired persons as resources allow, as determined by the department. Priority in provision of community care services to such other persons shall be based on economic, social, and medical needs.

All individuals seeking certification for benefits conferred by the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” as amended, to be used to pay the cost of placement in a long-term care facility or individuals who would be eligible for such benefits within 180 days of nursing home admission, shall, as a precondition to such certification, undergo evaluation by an assessment team designated by the lead agency to determine if institutionalization can be avoided by provision of more cost-effective community based services. If the individual being evaluated requires community based services which, over a 12 month period, would cost more than the cost of care in a long-term care facility, then such community based services shall not be deemed cost effective. Such cost-effective determination shall apply to each case management evaluation. The assessment team shall, at a minimum, consist of a physician, a registered nurse, and a social worker. Whenever possible, the assessment team shall be responsible for the precertification for nursing home placement and determination of the appropriate level of care, as required by the State Plan for Medical Assistance, as defined in the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977.”

The decision of the assessment team shall be forwarded to the department designated in the State Plan for Medical Assistance, as defined in the “Georgia Medical Assistance Act of 1977,” as responsible for the certification of benefits for individuals. If the assessment team and the case manager have determined that an individual could be better and more cost effectively served in the community, the department shall not certify such individual for skilled or intermediate institutional nursing care service benefits until the lead agency has informed such individual of the availability of community based services within the lead agency’s geographic service area and of the right of such individual to choose to receive those services as an alternative to placement in a long-term care facility. Such individual shall advise the lead agency of his or her choice of service alternatives. If such individual is otherwise eligible for those benefits for which certification is sought, the department shall certify the individual either for placement in a long-term care facility or for receiving community based services, as the individual advised the lead agency. The evaluation and certification shall be completed in a timely manner.

The lead agency shall seek to utilize volunteers to provide community services for functionally impaired elderly persons. The department may provide appropriate insurance coverage to protect volunteers from personal liability while acting within the scope of their volunteer assignments in the community care service system. Coverage may also include excess automobile liability protection.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1904D, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-6-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46; Ga. L. 2016, p. 737, § 1/HB 1085.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “shall be based” for “will be based” near the end of subsection (d); substituted “such certification” for “that certification” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (e); and, in subsection (f), substituted “such individual” for “that individual” throughout, substituted “department” for “agency” near the middle of the first sentence, substituted “the department” for “said agency” near the middle of the second sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “Such individual” for “That individual” at the beginning, and substituted “his or her” for “that individual’s” near the middle, and substituted “the department” for “the agency responsible for certification of benefits” near the middle of the fourth sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “community based” was substituted for “community-based” in the first sentences of subsections (a) and (d).

U.S. Code.

The federal Older Americans Act of 1965, referred to in paragraph (c)(10), is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 3001

et seq.

Paragraph (c)(11) refers to grants to states for services under “Title XX,” a reference to Title XX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, which is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1397

et seq.

49-6-64.
Adoption of rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1905D, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-6-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38.